Utah statutes.
73-20-8.   Emergency Water Resources Account -- Creation -- Purpose.

There is hereby created within the Water Resources Construction Fund an account to be known as the "Emergency Water Resources Account," the proceeds of which shall be used exclusively for the development of emergency water resources.



Amended by Chapter 169, 1988 General Session

